Utah statutes.
4-39-106.   Department to make rules.

(1)  The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, after considering the recommendations of the advisory council:

(a)  specifying procedures for the application and renewal of licenses for operating a domesticated elk facility;

(b)  governing the disposal or removal of domesticated elk from a domesticated elk facility for which the license has lapsed or been revoked;

(c)  setting standards and requirements for operating a domesticated elk facility;

(d)  setting health requirements and standards for health inspections; and

(e)  governing the possession, transportation, and accompanying documentation of domesticated elk carcasses.

(2)  The department may make other rules consistent with its responsibilities set forth in Section 4-39-103.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

